Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.250

Candidates, when included. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

If the legislative authority of a county or first-class or code city provides for the inclusion of candidates in the local voters' pamphlet, the pamphlet shall include the statements from candidates and may also include those candidates' photographs.

[ 2003 c 111 s 817. Prior: 1984 c 106 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.81A.050.]

PDFRCW 29A.32.250

Candidate statements and photographs. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

Local voters' pamphlets shall include candidate statements accepted by the county auditor and may also include candidates' photographs accepted by the county auditor.

[ 2024 c 78 s 10; 2003 c 111 s 817. Prior: 1984 c 106 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.81A.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.